Utah statutes.
16-7-15.    Official representative -- Registered office -- Registered agent.

(1) (a)  A corporation sole altering, amending, or restating its articles of incorporation on or after May 3, 2004 shall continuously maintain with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code the name, title, and Utah street address of an official representative for the corporation sole.

(b)  The official representative described in Subsection (1)(a) shall, on behalf of the corporation sole, receive communication, notices, or demands from:

(i)  the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code; or

(ii)  any other state or federal authority, agency, or official.

(c)  If a corporation sole appoints a registered agent pursuant to Subsection (2), that registered agent is the official representative of the corporation sole for purposes of this Subsection (1).

(2) (a)  A corporation sole formed under this chapter may maintain a registered office and registered agent in Utah by complying with Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.

(b)  A corporation sole maintaining registered agent may change the registered agent by complying with the requirements of Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.

(c)  A registered agent of a corporation sole may resign by complying with the requirements imposed on a registered agent under Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.

(d)  A registered agent described in this Subsection (2) is the agent of the corporation sole for service of:

(i)  process;

(ii)  notice;

(iii)  demand; or

(iv)  any type required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation sole.

